Washington statutes.
RCW 19.142.005

Findings and declaration.

The legislature finds that there exist in connection with a substantial number of contracts for health studio services certain practices and business methods which have worked undue financial hardship upon some of the citizens of the state and that existing legal remedies are inadequate to correct existing problems in the industry. The legislature declares that it is a matter of public interest that the citizens of our state be assured reasonable protection when contracting for health studio services.

[ 1987 c 317 s 1.]